Ohio, session 136, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) The Department of Medicaid shall enter into 4
a data sharing agreement with the Auditor of State for the 5
exchange of, and the provision of access to, data and other 6
enrollment and eligibility information related to all Medicaid 7
enrollees who are members of the aged, blind, and disabled 8
eligibility group. 9
(B) Using the information received under division (A) of 10
this section, the Auditor of State shall conduct a full audit of 11
the Medicaid program to determine whether any individuals 12
enrolled in the Medicaid program on the basis of being a member 13
of the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group are 14
ineligible to participate in the Medicaid program. The audit 15
shall specifically examine whether individuals who are members 16
of the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group have 17
countable assets that exceed the limits specified in 42 C.F.R. 18
416.1205. 19
(C) Upon the conclusion of the audit conducted under this 20

S. B. No. 222 Page 2
As Introduced
section, the Department of Medicaid shall initiate a corrective 21
action plan, designed to reduce spending in the Medicaid program 22
for individuals in the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility 23
group by $2,400,000,000 during the biennium, that does all of 24
the following: 25
(1) Disenrolls individuals who are determined by the audit 26
to be ineligible for continued participation in the Medicaid 27
program; 28
(2) Establishes and implements an electronic asset 29
verification system for all applicants and enrollees in the 30
aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group; 31
(3) Undertakes other initiatives designed to reduce 32
spending in the Medicaid program for individuals in the aged, 33
blind, and disabled eligibility group. 34
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 35
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 36
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 37
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 38
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 39
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 40
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 41
Section 3. 42
43
1 2 3 4 5
A AUD AUDITOR OF STATE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 070401 Audit Management and $5,000,000 $0

S. B. No. 222 Page 3
As Introduced
Services
D General Revenue Fund Total $5,000,000 $0
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,000,000 $0
AUDIT MANAGEMENT AND SERVICES 44
The foregoing appropriation item 070401, Audit Management 45
and Services, shall be used to conduct an audit in accordance 46
with Section 1 of this act. 47
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 48
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 49
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 50
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 51
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 52
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 53
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 54
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 55
of the 136th General Assembly. 56